Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,108
Emergency order; hearing.

Whenever the director finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health and safety, the director may, without notice or hearing, issue an order reciting the existence of such emergency and requiring that such action be taken as is necessary to meet the emergency including, but not limited to, closure of the site. Such order shall be effective immediately. Any person to whom such order is directed shall comply immediately, but on application to the director, such person shall be afforded a hearing not later than ten days after receipt of such application. On the basis of such hearing, the director shall continue, modify, or revoke such order within thirty days after such hearing.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 31.